North Dakota statutes. TITLE 27 Judicial Branch of Government
CHAPTER 27-20.3 Child Welfare
27-20.3-26.
Limitations of time on orders of disposition.

An order terminating parental rights is without limit as to duration.

An order of disposition requiring services for the family without the removal of custody may not exceed twelve months from disposition unless extended by the court. The human service zone may request two extensions of up to four months each for the family to complete the treatment goals of the court order and the case plan.

Except as provided in subsection 2, an order of disposition pursuant to which a child is placed in foster care may not continue in force for more than twelve months after the child is considered to have entered foster care. Before the extension of any court order limited under this subsection, a permanency hearing must be conducted. Any other order of disposition may not continue in force for more than twelve months.

Except after a termination of parental rights finding, the court may terminate an order of disposition before the expiration of the order or extend its duration for further periods. An order of extension may be made if:

A hearing is held before the expiration of the order upon motion of a party or on the court’s own motion;

Reasonable notice of the hearing and opportunity to be heard are given to the parties affected;

The court finds the extension is necessary to accomplish the purposes of the order extended; and

The extension does not exceed twelve months from the expiration of an order limited by subsection 3 or two years from the expiration of any other limited order.

The court may terminate an order of disposition or extension before its expiration, on or without an application of a party, if it appears to the court the purposes of the order have been accomplished. If a party may be affected adversely by the order of termination, the order may be made only after reasonable notice and opportunity to be heard have been given to the party.

Except as provided in subsection 1, when the child attains the age of twenty years, all orders affecting the child then in force terminate and the child is discharged from further obligation or control.

If an order of disposition is made with respect to a child under the age of ten years pursuant to which the child is placed in foster care without terminating parental rights and the parent and child relationship, the court, before extending the duration of the order, shall determine upon the extension hearing whether the child is adoptable and whether termination of those rights and that relationship is warranted under section 27-20.3-03.1 and is in the best interest of the child. In that case the notice of the extension hearing also must inform the parties affected that the court will determine whether the child is adoptable and whether termination of their parental rights and the parent and child relationship is warranted and in the best interest of the child and that a further order of disposition may be made by the court placing the child with a view to adoption. If the court determines the child is adoptable and termination of parental rights and the parent and child relationship is warranted and is in the best interest of the child, the court shall make a further order of disposition terminating those rights and that relationship and committing the child under section 27-20.3-09.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.